Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1616.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 4305 OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 4305. DEALING IN INFANT CHILDREN.(A) OFFENSE DEFINED.--A PERSON IS GUILTY OF A [MISDEMEANOR] FELONY OF THE FIRST DEGREE IF HE DEALS IN HUMANITY, BY TRADING, BARTERING, BUYING, SELLING, OR DEALING IN INFANT CHILDREN.(B) EXCLUSION.--THIS SECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO AN OTHERWISE LEGAL SURROGACY OR ADOPTION.(C) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "INFANT <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 CHILD" MEANS A CHILD ONE YEAR OF AGE OR YOUNGER.SECTION 2. TITLE 42 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 5988.1. Sentencing considerations for child victim offenders.(a) Court discretion.--Subject to subsection (b), if a child is convicted of an offense in a criminal proceeding following a motion filed by the prosecutor or the defendant and a hearing on the motion and the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that a victim of the child's criminal conduct had, within one year prior to the child's commission of the offense, engaged in, or forced or compelled the child to engage in, prohibited sexual conduct, and the child's commission of the offense was a direct result of the prohibited sexual conduct, or the child acted under the influence of substantial emotional distress during the commission of the offense, the court may:(1) depart from any applicable mandatory minimum sentence or sentencing enhancement;(2) impose a determination of guilt without further penalty;(3) transfer the child's case to the division or a judge of the court assigned to conduct juvenile hearings; or(4) reduce or waive the imposition of fines, court costs or restitution.(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a child's conviction for any offense:(1) under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 30 (relating to human trafficking) or 31 (relating to sexual offenses); or(2) involving any victim who did not engage in, or force or compel the child to engage in, prohibited sexual conduct.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250HB1616PN3333 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emotional distress." A temporary or permanent state of mental anguish caused or induced by the prohibited sexual conduct."Prohibited sexual conduct." Any activity prohibited under any of the following provisions under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses):(1) Any of the offenses enumerated in Chapter 30, if the activity involved sexual servitude, as defined in section 3001 (relating to definitions).(2) Section 3121(c) (relating to rape).(3) Section 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault).(4) Section 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(5) Section 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).(6) Section 3124.3 (relating to sexual assault by sports official, volunteer or employee of nonprofit association).(7) Section 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(8) Section 3126 (relating to indecent assault).(9) Section 5902(b), (b.1), (d) and (e) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(10) Section 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1616PN3333 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526